New York, session 2025-2026, A9263.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-s to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-s. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to 2LT 4 Edward Dixon Neal. The bridge on state route 20A, designated as bridge 5 number 1016130, which crosses over Tonawanda Creek, in the town of 6 Sheldon, county of Wyoming, shall be dedicated to 2LT Edward Dixon Neal. 7 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 8 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 9 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 10 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to 2LT Edward Dixon Neal". Howev- 11 er, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, 12 the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be 13 one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge shall not 14 be changed as a result of this act. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13919-02-6